Maryland, session 2026, SB0456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1D–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of this title.
(d) “Fantasy competition” includes any online fantasy or simulated game or
contest such as fantasy sports, in which:
(1) participants [own, manage, or coach] ASSEMBLE imaginary teams OR
ROSTERS;
(2) (I) THE VALUE OF all prizes and awards offered to winning
participants are established and made known to participants in advance of the game or
contest;
(II) MULTIPLE WINNING PARTICIPANTS MAY SHARE A PRIZE OR
AWARD; AND
(III) PRIZES MAY CONSIST OF FIXED AMOUNTS, TIERED
PAYOUTS, OR ANY OTHER CONDITIONAL BONUS PAYOUTS, PROVIDED THAT ALL
PRIZE STRUCTURES ARE DISCLOSED IN ADVANCE BY THE FANTASY COMPETITION
OPERATOR;
(3) A PARTICIPANT COMPETES AGAINST OTHER PARTICIPANTS,
INCLUDING PARTICIPATION IN CONTESTS WHERE THE PARTICIPANTS ASSEMBLE
ROSTERS OR TEAMS OF TWO OR MORE INDIVIDUAL REAL–LIFE ATHLETES AND
SELECT BETWEEN THE HIGHER OR LOWER OF PROJECTED OR ACTUAL
PERFORMANCE STATISTICS FOR EACH ATHLETE;
[(3)] (4) the winning outcome of the game or contest reflects the relative
skill of the participants and is determined by statistics generated by actual individuals
(players or teams in the case of a professional sport); and
[(4)] (5) no winning outcome is based:
(i) solely on the performance of an individual athlete; or

SENATE BILL 456 3
(ii) on the score, point spread, or any performances of any single
real–world team or any combination of real–world teams.
(e) (1) “Fantasy competition operator” means any person that offers services
in connection with fantasy competitions to individuals by means of:
(i) the Internet;
(ii) a smart phone application; or
(iii) any other electronics, digital media, communication technology,
or device.
(2) “Fantasy competition operator” includes, for purposes of the federal
Bank Secrecy Act of 1970 and its related regulations, a gaming establishment having at
least $1,000,000 in annual gross revenue.
(3) “Fantasy competition operator” does not include an individual who:
(i) organizes a fantasy competition in which the individual also
participates; and
(ii) receives no compensation for organizing the fantasy competition.
(f) “Fantasy competition player” means an individual who participates in a
fantasy competition offered by a fantasy competition operator.
9–1D–02.
(a) [Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 12 of the Criminal Law Article or any
other title, and except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, the prohibitions
against] A FANTASY COMPETITION CONDUCTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT CONSTITUTE betting, wagering, [and] OR
gambling [do not apply to participation in a fantasy competition] FOR ANY PURPOSE.
(b) A person may not operate a kiosk or machine that offers fantasy competition
to the public in a place of business physically located in the State.
9–1D–03.
(a) A fantasy competition operator shall register with the Commission before the
fantasy competition operator may offer a fantasy competition or services in connection with
a fantasy competition in the State.
(b) Unless a registration is renewed for a 1–year term, the registration expires 1
year from the initial date of registration.

SENATE BILL 456
(c) (1) The Commission [may] SHALL impose [a] AN ANNUAL fee OF $50,000
for the registration of a fantasy competition operator in accordance with this section.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REGISTRATION FEE
COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S
FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
9–1D–05.
(A) EACH FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A PROGRAM TO MITIGATE AND CURTAIL
COMPULSIVE PLAY; AND
(2) INCLUDE A STATEMENT REGARDING OBTAINING ASSISTANCE
WITH REAL–MONEY GAMING PROBLEMS ON:
(I) THE FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR’S PORTAL,
WEBSITE, OR COMPUTER OR MOBILE APPLICATION; AND
(II) ALL MARKETING MATERIALS AND ADVERTISEMENTS OF THE
FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH A VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST OF INDIVIDUALS
WHO HAVE REQUESTED TO BE EXCLUDED FROM ANY FANTASY COMPETITION
LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) PROVIDE A SIMPLE MECHANISM FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
SOBER AND INFORMED TO REQUEST PLACEMENT ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL INCORPORATE THE VOLUNTARY
SELF–EXCLUSION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION INTO ANY OTHER SELF–EXCLUSION PROGRAM THAT THE
COMMISSION OPERATES.
(C) A FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR:
(1) MAY NOT PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST TO ESTABLISH A FANTASY COMPETITION ACCOUNT OR PARTICIPATE IN
FANTASY COMPETITIONS; AND

SENATE BILL 456 5
(2) MAY PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST
WHO PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED A FANTASY COMPETITION ACCOUNT TO ACCESS
THE ACCOUNT ONLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF VIEWING AND DOWNLOADING THE
INDIVIDUAL’S TRANSACTION HISTORY.
(D) IF A SELF–EXCLUDED INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATES IN A FANTASY
COMPETITION, THE FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR SHALL REPORT TO THE
COMMISSION, AT MINIMUM:
(1) THE NAME OF THE SELF–EXCLUDED INDIVIDUAL;
(2) THE DATE OF THE PARTICIPATION;
(3) THE AMOUNT OR VALUE OF ANY MONEY, PRIZES, OR AWARDS
FORFEITED, IF ANY; AND
(4) ANY OTHER ACTION TAKEN BY THE FANTASY COMPETITION
OPERATOR.
(E) (1) A FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR MAY NOT PAY ANY PRIZE OR
AWARD TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ON THE COMMISSION’S SELF–EXCLUSION LIST.
(2) ANY PRIZE OR AWARD WON BY AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE
SELF–EXCLUSION LIST IS FORFEITED AND SHALL BE TRANSFERRED BY THE
FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE ON A QUARTERLY BASIS, AS
SPECIFIED BY THE COMMISSION.
(F) THE COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE SANCTIONS ON A FANTASY
COMPETITION OPERATOR THAT KNOWINGLY FAILS TO EXCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL ON
THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST FROM PARTICIPATING IN FANTASY
COMPETITIONS.
[9–1D–05.] 9–1D–06.
[(a)] The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
subtitle.
[(b) The regulations adopted under this section may include requirements for the
establishment of a voluntary exclusion list.]
9–1E–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 456
(i) (1) “Sporting event” means:
(i) a professional sports or athletic event;
(ii) a collegiate sports or athletic event;
(iii) an Olympic or international sports or athletic event;
(iv) an electronic sports or video game competition in which each
participant is at least 18 years old;
(v) a motor race event sanctioned by a motor racing governing entity;
(vi) except as otherwise prohibited under Title 11 of the Business
Regulation Article or the federal Interstate Horse Racing Act, a horse race, held in or out
of the State, if consented to and approved by:
1. the horse racing licensee of the applicable breed;
2. the organization representing the majority of the owners
and trainers of the applicable breed in the State;
3. the organization representing the majority of the
applicable breeders in the State; and
4. the State Racing Commission;
(vii) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBTITLE 1D OF THIS TITLE, any
portion of a sporting event, including the individual performance statistics of athletes or
competitors in a sporting event; or
(viii) an award event or competition of national or international
prominence if expressly authorized by the Commission.
(2) “Sporting event” does not include:
(i) a high school sports or athletic event; or
(ii) a fantasy competition regulated under Subtitle 1D of this title.
(j) (1) “Sports wagering” means the business of accepting wagers on any
sporting event by any system or method of wagering, including single–game bets, teaser
bets, parlays, over–under, moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in–game wagering,
in–play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets.

SENATE BILL 456 7
(2) “SPORTS WAGERING” DOES NOT INCLUDE A FANTASY
COMPETITION CONDUCTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH SUBTITLE 1D OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.